Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1407
Commission; removal of members by Governor; procedure.

Members may be removed by the Governor for cause but only after delivering to the member a copy of the charges and affording him or her an opportunity to be publicly heard in person, or by counsel, in his or her own defense upon not less than ten days' notice. Such hearing shall be held before the Governor. When a member is removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges made against such member and the findings thereon together with the complete record of the proceedings.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 10.